Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 327.
SECTION 2. (1) The Department of Education shall establish and administer  the Summer
Learning Grant program.
(2) Under the grant program, the department shall award grants for  summer learning
programs that are provided to incoming kindergarten students through  outgoing grade 12
students. A summer  learning program is eligible for a grant if the program meets all three
of the following requirements:
(a) The program provides academic enrichment by:
(A) Using a variety  of learning strategies that align with academic content standards
adopted under ORS 329.045 and focused on mathematics, science,  language arts or personal
financial education and that, when appropriate, assist with credit recovery; and
(B) As  appropriate, assisting with school readiness and providing transition supports
prior to kindergarten, prior  to middle school, through the middle and high school grades or
after high school graduation.
(b) The program provides youth development by using  a broad array of well-rounded
enrichment opportunities that:
(A) Include hands-on, inquiry-based and project-based learning,  which may include access
to the arts; and
(B) Support students’ mental, emotional and social well-being.
(c) The program provides equitable access, outreach and engagement by:
(A) Using culturally and linguistically  responsive approaches to student academic success
and well-being; and
(B) Engaging families as partners in students’ academic success.
(3) In addition to the requirements prescribed by  subsection (2) of this section, a summer
learning program must be provided for a minimum of  80 total hours for each session of the
program. Calculations made under this  subsection may include hours provided by an entity
with which a partnership has been entered, as described in subsection (4)(c) of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 4082 (HB 4082-B) Page 1
(4)(a) Any school district, education service district or public charter school, or any
combination thereof, may apply to receive a grant under this section for a summer  learning
program.
(b) The department shall award a grant  to an applicant based on whether the applicant
meets the requirements for the grant. An application for a grant must include:
(A) A description of the summer learning program  and how the program satisfies the
requirements described in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(B) Documentation that the applicant has a plan for summer learning,  which may in-
clude:
(i) A plan developed under ORS 327.185 to receive a grant from  the Student Investment
Account;
(ii) An early literacy success plan developed under ORS  327.831 to receive a grant under
the Early Literacy Success School Grant program;
(iii) A plan developed under ORS 327.883 to receive  a grant under the High School Grad-
uation and College and Career Readiness Act; or
(iv) A plan developed as required  to receive federal funding, as identified by the State
Board of Education by rule.
(C) A description of  how the grant will be used with other funding sources available to
the applicant.
(c)(A) An applicant for a grant may enter into a partnership with  one or more entities
to provide a summer learning program that is funded by a grant under this section.
(B) Entities with which an  applicant may enter into a partnership include a school dis-
trict, an education service district, a federally  recognized Indian tribe in this state, a
community-based organization, a unit of local government as defined in ORS 190.003 or a
local service district as defined in ORS 174.116.
(C) If an applicant applies for a grant based on a plan that  includes a partnership with
an entity identified in  subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the applicant must provide with
the application a written letter of support from the entity.  The  letter must  include a de-
scription of services to be provided by the entity and the budget of the entity for the  pro-
vision of those services.
(5)(a) The department shall award grants  under this section based on a formula estab-
lished by the State Board of Education by rule.
(b) When awarding grants, the department shall:
(A) Prioritize funding for  summer learning programs that serve student groups that have
historically experienced academic disparities, as described in ORS 327.180 (2)(b).
(B) Encourage and support partnerships with entities identified in subsection (4)(c)(B)
of this section to provide expanded learning opportunities during nonschool hours.
(c) The department  shall establish the process and timelines for awarding a grant under
this section. The process must be communicated on the department’s website and be easily
accessible by applicants.
(6)(a) Grants awarded under this section may be used for all expenses related to:
(A) Providing personnel and staffing for a summer learning program,  including profes-
sional development.
(B) Providing summer learning, including curriculum, technology and other supplies.
(C) Contracting with third parties to provide a summer learning program.
(D) Providing incentives and removing barriers to student  participation in a summer
learning program.
(E) Providing facilities that will support and accommodate a summer learning program.
(F) Providing student transportation for a summer learning program.
(G) Providing nutritious snacks and meals  to participants of a summer learning program.
(H) Engaging family members in summer learning program activities.
Enrolled House Bill 4082 (HB 4082-B) Page 2
(b) As provided  by rule of the State Board of Education, a recipient of a grant received
under this section may use a percentage of the grant moneys for  administrative expenses.
The rules shall:
(A) Provide for the use of grant moneys  for the administrative expenses of both the ap-
plicant and any entities with which the  applicant has entered into a partnership to provide
a summer learning program; and
(B) Limit the percentage of grant moneys that may be  used for administrative expenses,
as allowed under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, to no more than  a total of 10 percent
of the grant amount.
(7) In administering  the grant program, the department shall minimize administrative
barriers for grant recipients while retaining accountability for  resources allocated and spent.
Recipients of a grant must provide to the department a report that includes:
(a) The number and demographics of students served by the summer learning program;
(b) Activities of the summer learning program;
(c) Information regarding staffing levels of the summer learning program  and training
provided to staff of the summer learning program;
(d) A description of how  activities of the summer learning program supported the re-
quirements described in subsection (2) of this section; and
(e) A report on three or more of the following outcome areas:
(A) Perception surveys of the summer learning program, as provided  by students, staff
and families;
(B) Qualitative data and stories of impact for the summer learning program;
(C) Credits earned by participants of the summer learning program, if applicable;
(D) Participation of the summer learning program provider in site  visits, interviews or
focus groups; or
(E) Summer learning program evaluations by a third party.
(8) The  State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the administration
of this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Department of Education  shall study and propose recommendations
to develop an Oregon 21st Century Community Learning Center Initiative. The initiative shall
address education disparities through increased summer and after-school learning  opportu-
nities.
(2) Through the study, the department shall propose recommendations for the initiative
that:
(a) Ensure  equitable access to programs for historically underserved incoming
kindergarten students through outgoing grade 12 students.
(b) Identify funding mechanisms to ensure that  high-quality learning and enrichment
programs are provided during summer  or after school and are sustained in accordance with
research and best practices,  including identifying how the state could leverage existing
learning initiatives and programs and existing state-administered grant programs.
(c) Streamline grant administration and reduce  administrative burdens for grant appli-
cants and grant recipients while also maintaining high levels of accountability.
(d) Propose quality and oversight standards for the provision of summer and  after-school
learning and enrichment programs.
(e) Propose options for outcomes and metrics  to align programs across the goals identi-
fied in section 2 (2) of this 2024 Act.
(f) Identify incentives for school districts, education service districts, public charter
schools, federally recognized Indian tribes, community-based  organizations and other pro-
viders of learning and enrichment programs to build partnerships,  increase communication
and align strategies for supporting children and students.
Enrolled House Bill 4082 (HB 4082-B) Page 3
(g) Establish best practices for the design and administration of a state grant program,
including timing, insurance, the  application process and review, staff training, data collection
and standards for reporting and communicating impact.
(3) For the purpose of the study conducted under this  section, the department shall
consult with education stakeholders, including school districts, education  service districts,
public charter schools, federally recognized Indian tribes, community-based  organizations
and other providers of learning and enrichment programs.
(4) The  department shall submit a report on the study in the manner provided by ORS
192.245 to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education no later
than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 4.
Section 3 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 14, chapter 449, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department  of Educa-
tion from the Statewide Education Initiatives Account established under  ORS 327.250, for
operations, is increased by $141,767,  for the administration of grants for summer learning
programs during the 2023-2025 biennium.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Education by section 1 (1), chapter 449, Oregon  Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for operations, is  increased by $417,039, to implement the
provisions of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 13 (3), chapter 449, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payments of grants-in-aid, program costs and
purchased services by the Department of Education  from the Statewide Education Initiatives
Account established under ORS 327.250,  for all other grants, is increased by $30,000,000, for
summer learning programs during the 2023-2025 biennium.
SECTION 8. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4082 (HB 4082-B) Page 4
Passed by House March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4082 (HB 4082-B) Page 5